Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4038.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 13. (1) All money received and collected under this act
shall must be deposited by the department in the insurance provider
fund established in this section.
(2) The insurance provider fund is created within the state
treasury and shall must be administered by the department for
auditing purposes.
(3) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall
direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit
DAW H00859'25 (H-1) ho8c5x


to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments.
(4) The department shall expend money from the fund, upon on
appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes:
(a) Beginning in the 2018-2019 state fiscal year ending
September 30, 2019, the first $14,000,000.00 to be appropriated for
the payment of actuarially sound capitation rates to Medicaid
managed care organizations, and each state fiscal year thereafter,
the amount necessary to continue to support the payment of
actuarially sound capitation rates to Medicaid managed care
organizations.
(b) For the 2018-2019 state fiscal year, to appropriate an
amount not to exceed $315,000,000.00 to offset the net revenue lost
under the health insurance claims assessment act, 2011 PA 142, MCL
550.1731 to 550.1741.
(c) For the 2019-2020 state fiscal year, to appropriate an
amount not to exceed $240,000,000.00 to offset the net revenue lost
under the health insurance claims assessment act, 2001 PA 142, MCL
550.1731 to 550.1741.
(b) (d) To pay administrative and compliance costs in
accordance with section 15.
(c) For the state fiscal year ending September 30, 2026,
$6,000,000.00 to the health data utility selected under section
2508 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.2508.
(d) For the state fiscal year ending September 30, 2027,
$7,000,000.00 to the health data utility selected under section
2508 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.2508.
(e) For the state fiscal year ending September 30, 2028, and
each subsequent state fiscal year, $8,000,000.00 to the health data
utility selected under section 2508 of the public health code, 1978
DAW H00859'25 (H-1) ho8c5x


PA 368, MCL 333.2508. Beginning January 1, 2029, and each January 1
after that date, the state treasurer shall adjust the amount under
this subdivision in accordance with the Consumer Price Index. As
used in this subdivision, "Consumer Price Index" means the annual
average percentage change in the Detroit Consumer Price Index for
all items for the prior 12-month period as reported by the United
States Department of Labor.
(f) (e) The balance of the fund remaining after the
appropriations described in subdivisions (a) , (b), (c), and
(d)shall to (e) must be transferred to a separate restricted
account within the insurance provider fund and only used only as
appropriated by the legislature.
(5) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall
must remain in the fund and shall must not lapse to the general
fund.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. 4037 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
DAW H00859'25 (H-1) ho8c5x